Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.418

Auditing services revolving account—Direct payments from state agencies.

In cases where there are unanticipated demands for auditing services or where there are insufficient funds on hand or available for payment through the auditing services revolving account or in other cases of necessity, the state auditor may request payment for auditing services directly from state agencies for whom the services are performed to the extent that revenues or other funds are available. Upon approval by the director of financial management the state agency shall make the requested payment. The payment may be made on either an advance or reimbursable basis as approved by the director of financial management.

[ 1995 c 301 s 29; 1981 c 336 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 336: See note following RCW 43.09.410.